Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.051

Supplemental principles of law—Rate of interest.

(1) Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

(2) If an obligation to pay interest arises under this chapter and the rate is not specified, the rate is that specified in RCW 19.52.010(1).

[ 2009 c 188 s 107.]